Oklahoma, session 2025, SB429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 17 O.S. 2021, Section 160.20, as

amended by Section 21, Chapter 126, O.S.L. 2023 (17 O.S. Supp. 2024,

Section 160.20), is amended to read as follows:

Section 160.20. A. After August 21, 2015, no wind energy

facility may be constructed if the base of any tower is located at a

distance of less than:

1. One and one-half (1 1/2) nautical miles from the center line

of any runway located on:



Req. No. 1112 Page 1

a. a public-use airport as defined in Section 120.2 of

Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or

b. an airport owned by a municipality;

2. One and one-half (1 1/2) nautical miles from any public

school which is a part of a public school district; or

3. One and one-half (1 1/2) nautical miles from a hospital.

B. After June 1, 2025, no wind energy facility may be

constructed if the base of any tower is located at a distance of

less than:

1. One and one-half (1 1/2) nautical miles from the nearest

point on the outside wall of any residential dwelling; and

2. One and one-half (1 1/2) nautical miles from the nearest

point of any nonparticipating property.

C. Attestation of compliance with the setback requirements in

this section shall be included in any reports required by the

Corporation Commission. Stakeholder and landowner disputes arising

under subsection A or B of this section shall fall under the

exclusive jurisdiction of the district courts. The Corporation

Commission may seek enforcement of the submission and attestation

requirements of this subsection and subsection C D of this section

through its administrative court system.

C. D. After April 3, 2018, construction or operation of a

proposed individual wind turbine or any other individual structure

requiring a Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) Form 7460-1 that

Req. No. 1112 Page 2

is p art of a wind energy facility shall not encroach upon or

otherwise have a significant adverse impact on the mission,

training, or operations of any military installation or branch of

military as determined by the Military Aviation and Installation

Assurance Siting Clearinghouse (Clearinghouse) and the FAA. Areas

of impact include, but are not limited to, military training routes,

drop zones, approaches to runways, and bombing ranges. No

individual wind turbine or any other individual structure that

requires a an FAA 7460-1 form that is part of a wind energy facility

may be constructed or expanded unless there is an active

Determination of No Hazard from the FAA and adverse impacts to the

United States Department of Defense, pursuant to Title 32 of the

Code of Federal Regulations, Section 211.6, have been resolved as

evidenced by documentation from the Clearinghouse for the individual

wind turbine or other individual structure. The Mission

Compatibility Certification Letter or successor form may serve as

such evidence of adverse impacts being resolved with the Department

of Defense or successor agency.

1. The Determination of No Hazard and documentation of the

resolution of adverse impacts to the Department of Defense shall be

filed with the Corporation Commission and the Oklahoma Department of

Aerospace and Aeronautics.

2. The requirements established by this subsection shall not

prohibit the construction of an individual wind turbine or any other

Req. No. 1112 Page 3

indi vidual structure requiring a an FAA 7460-1 form that is part of

a wind energy facility if that individual wind turbine or other

individual structure has received a Determination of No Hazard or

mitigation plan on or before April 3, 2018.

3. The Corporation Commission is authorized to promulgate rules

and regulations for the implementation of the provisions of this

section and Section 160.21 of this title.

D. E. If an owner of a wind energy facility fails to submit an

active Determination of No Hazard and documentation that adverse

impacts to the Department of Defense have been resolved by the

Clearinghouse for the individual wind turbine or other individual

structure prior to the start of construction, the owner shall be

subject to an administrative penalty not to exceed One Thousand Five

Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) per day, per violation from the

Corporation Commission as provided by law. In addition,

stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the Corporation

Commission or the Oklahoma Department of Aerospace and Aeronautics,

may institute an action in any court of general jurisdiction to

prevent, restrain, correct, or abate any violation of subsection C D

of this section other than Corporation Commission actions related to

submissions or attestations.

SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby



Req. No. 1112 Page 4

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-1-1112 RD 1/14/2025 3:51:20 PM









































Req. No. 1112 Page 5